Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.407

Annuities and retirement income plans—Credit for authorized leaves of absence without pay.

(1) A faculty member or other employee designated by the boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of trustees of the regional universities and The Evergreen State College, or the *state board for community college education who is granted an authorized leave of absence without pay may apply the period of time while on the leave in the computation of benefits in any annuity and retirement plan authorized under RCW 28B.10.400 through 28B.10.430 only to the extent provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) An employee who is eligible under subsection (1) of this section may receive a maximum of two years' credit during the employee's entire working career for periods of authorized leave without pay. Such credit may be obtained only if the employee pays both the employer and employee contributions required under RCW 28B.10.405 and 28B.10.410 while on the authorized leave of absence and if the employee returns to employment with the university or college immediately following the leave of absence for a period of not less than two years. The employee and employer contributions shall be based on the average of the employee's compensation at the time the leave of absence was authorized and the time the employee resumes employment. Any benefit under **RCW 28B.10.400(3) shall be based only on the employee's compensation earned from employment with the university or college.

An employee who is inducted into the armed forces of the United States shall be deemed to be on an unpaid, authorized leave of absence.

[ 1987 c 448 s 1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The state board for community college education was renamed the state board for community and technical colleges by 1991 c 238 s 30.

**(2) RCW 28B.10.400 was amended by 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 2, changing subsection (3) to subsection (1)(c).